Alaska, session 34, SB187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.03 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 14.03.087. Prohibited food additives. A public school may not serve, as 06 part of a breakfast or lunch provided by the school to enrolled students during a school 07 day, a food or beverage that contains any of the following color additives certified by 08 the United States Food and Drug Administration under 21 U.S.C. 379e: 09 (1) red dye 3 (U.S. Chemical Abstracts Service no. 16423-68-0); 10 (2) red dye 40 (U.S. Chemical Abstracts Service no. 25956-17-6); 11 (3) yellow dye 5 (U.S. Chemical Abstracts Service no. 1934-21-0); 12 (4) yellow dye 6 (U.S. Chemical Abstracts Service no. 2783-94-0); 13 (5) blue dye 1 (U.S. Chemical Abstracts Service no. 3844-45-9); 14 (6) blue dye 2 (U.S. Chemical Abstracts Service no. 860-22-0); or 01 (7) green dye 3 (U.S. Chemical Abstracts Service no. 2353-45-9). 02 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect January 1, 2028. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.